California, session 20252026, AB2378.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14130.5 is added to the Penal Code, to read:14130.5. (a) The Office of Community Violence Intervention is hereby established within the Board of State and Community Corrections and shall be led by a director.(b) The director shall be selected by the board. The board shall consult with organizations in the field of community violence intervention on factors to consider when evaluating candidates. In selecting a director, the board shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) An individual’s lived experience with violence, including, but not limited to, experience as an individual directly or indirectly impacted by violence.(2) An individual’s demonstrated knowledge of, and first-hand experience with, addressing the needs and challenges of communities affected by violence and of the community violence intervention field.(3) An individual’s demonstrated history of leadership, service, and professional experience at organizations in the field of community violence intervention. (b)(c) The Office of Community Violence Intervention shall do all of the following:(1) Administer the California Violence Intervention and Prevention Grant Program (CalVIP) as provided in Section 14131.(2) Advise the board on the implementation of community violence intervention and prevention policies.(3) Coordinate with the Department of Justice’s Office of Gun Violence Prevention to create a statewide strategic plan for community violence intervention and prevention programs.(4) Develop methods of measuring the capacity of the community violence intervention and prevention field in California and gather data from CalVIP grantees.(5) Educate the public about community violence causes and effective solutions.(6) Identify and apply for available federal grants and other funding to further its work to prevent community violence. When the office determines it is appropriate, the office may work in collaboration with other state departments and partners to identify and apply for federal grants and other funding.(7) Convene and facilitate the executive steering committee created by subdivision (k) of Section 14131.(8) Serve as a liaison to community violence intervention and prevention stakeholders, including other governmental agencies.(9) Provide technical assistance for community violence intervention and prevention organizations and CalVIP grantees.(10) On July 1, 2028, and every two years thereafter, produce a report that does all of the following:(A) Highlights best practices in the community violence intervention and prevention field.(B) Identifies barriers to success, policy gaps, and promising practices that could be scaled or replicated in the state.(C) Includes the evaluations of the impact of the violence prevention initiatives prepared pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 14131.(D) Recommends strategies, policies, and priorities for reducing community violence to the board, Legislature, and other stakeholders.(11) (A) Within 60 days after completing the report in paragraph (10), the office shall make the report publicly available and transmit copies to the Governor’s office, the Senate Committee on Public Safety, and the Assembly Committee on Public Safety.(B) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. Section 14131 of the Penal Code is amended to read:14131. (a) The California Violence Intervention and Prevention Grant Program (CalVIP) is hereby created to be administered by the Office of Community Violence Intervention within the Board of State and Community Corrections.(b) The purpose of CalVIP is to improve public health and safety by supporting effective community gun violence reduction initiatives in communities that are disproportionately impacted by community gun violence. For purposes of this section, “community gun violence” means intentional acts of interpersonal violence involving a firearm, generally committed in public areas by individuals who are not intimately related to the victim, and which result in physical injury, emotional harm, or death.(c) CalVIP grants shall be used to develop, support, expand, and replicate evidence-based community gun violence reduction initiatives, including, without limitation, hospital-based violence intervention programs, evidence-based street outreach programs, and focused deterrence strategies, that seek to interrupt cycles of community gun violence and retaliation in order to reduce the incidence of homicides, shootings, and aggravated assaults. These initiatives shall be primarily focused on providing violence intervention services to the small segment of the population that is identified as high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future.(d) CalVIP grants shall be made on a competitive basis to cities that are disproportionately impacted by community gun violence, to community-based organizations that serve the residents of those cities, and to counties that have one or more cities disproportionately impacted by community gun violence within their jurisdiction. For purposes of this section, “cities” includes tribal governments.(e) For purposes of this section, a city is disproportionately impacted by community gun violence if any of the following are true:(1) The city experienced 20 or more homicides per calendar year during two or more of the three calendar years immediately preceding the grant application for which the Department of Justice has available data.(2) The city experienced 10 or more homicides per calendar year and had a homicide rate that was at least 50 percent higher than the statewide homicide rate during two or more of the three calendar years immediately preceding the grant application for which the Department of Justice has available data.(3) (A) An applicant otherwise demonstrates a unique and compelling need for additional resources to address the impact of community gun violence in the applicant’s community. Recognizing(B) Recognizing the historical challenges that California tribes have faced in gathering formal data on violent crime, the Board of State and Community Corrections, in consultation with the Office of Community Violence Intervention, shall take input from tribal governments on how to determine “compelling need,” in the context of tribal governments.(C) The Board of State and Community Corrections, in consultation with the Office of Community Violence Intervention, shall also take input from cities with a population of fewer than 30,000 residents to determine “compelling need,” in the context of small cities.(f) An applicant for a CalVIP grant shall submit a proposal, in a form prescribed by the board, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Clearly defined and measurable objectives for the grant.(2) A statement describing how the applicant proposes to use the grant to implement an evidence-based community gun violence reduction initiative in accordance with this section, including how the applicant will identify, engage, and provide violence intervention services to individuals at high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future.(3) A statement describing how the applicant proposes to use the grant to enhance coordination of existing community gun violence prevention and intervention programs and minimize duplication of services in the proposed service area. Where relevant, this shall include a description of efforts to coordinate with tribal governments located near or within the planned service delivery area.(4) Evidence indicating that the proposed violence reduction initiative would likely reduce the incidence of community gun violence in the proposed service area within the grant period.(5) For city or county applicants, a statement demonstrating support for the proposed violence reduction initiative from one or more community-based organizations, or from a public agency or department other than a law enforcement agency that is primarily dedicated to community safety or violence prevention.(g) In awarding CalVIP grants, the board shall give preference to applicants whose grant proposals demonstrate the greatest likelihood of reducing the incidence of community gun violence in the applicant’s community within the grant period without contributing to mass incarceration.(h) The amount of funds awarded to an applicant shall be commensurate with the scope of the applicant’s proposal and the applicant’s demonstrated need for additional resources to address community gun violence in the applicant’s community.(1) The Office of Community Violence Intervention shall recommend grant awardees, and the Board of State and Community Corrections may award competitive grants in amounts not to exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) per applicant per year. The length of the grant cycle shall be at least three years.(2) The board shall award at least two grants to cities or counties with populations of 200,000 or less.(i) Upon making CalVIP grant awards, the board shall make at least 20 percent of an approved grantee’s total grant award available to the grantee at the start of the grant period or as soon as possible thereafter, in order to enable grantees to immediately utilize such funds to support violence reduction initiatives.(j) Each city or county that receives a CalVIP grant shall distribute no less than 50 percent of the grant funds to one or more of any of the following types of entities:(1) Community-based organizations.(2) Public agencies or departments, other than law enforcement agencies or departments, that are primarily dedicated to community safety or violence prevention.(3) Tribal governments.(k) The board shall form an executive steering committee convened and facilitated by the Office of Community Violence Intervention, including, without limitation, persons who have been impacted by community gun violence, formerly incarcerated persons, subject matter experts in community gun violence prevention and intervention, the director of the Office of Gun Violence Prevention or the director’s designee, and at least three persons with direct experience in implementing evidence-based community gun violence reduction initiatives, including initiatives that incorporate public health and community-based approaches focused on providing violence intervention services to the small segment of the population identified as high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future.(l) (1) The board shall reserve at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) and may reserve up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated for CalVIP each year for the Office of Community Violence Intervention for the purposes of administering and promoting the effectiveness of the program including, without limitation, the employment of personnel, providing technical assistance to grantees, coordinating with other state and local agencies on community gun violence reduction efforts, and evaluation of violence reduction initiatives supported by CalVIP.(2) The Office of Community Violence Intervention may recommend, with the advice and assistance of the CalVIP executive steering committee, and the board may reserve up to 5 percent of the funds appropriated for CalVIP each year for the purpose of supporting programs and activities designed to build and sustain capacity in the field of community gun violence intervention and prevention, and to support detailed community gun violence problem analyses that help service providers and other stakeholders inform and develop community gun violence reduction initiatives by identifying individuals in their community who are at high risk of perpetrating or being victimized by community gun violence in the near future and have the highest need for violence intervention services. Activities to build and sustain capacity in the field of community-based gun violence intervention and prevention may include any of the following:(A) Contracting with or providing grants to organizations that provide training, certification, or continued professional development to community-based gun violence intervention and prevention professionals, including frontline professionals and technical assistance providers.(B) Contracting with or providing grants to nonprofit intermediary organizations that foster the development and growth of community-based organizations dedicated to community gun violence intervention and prevention.(C) Providing mental health support and other supportive services to frontline community gun violence intervention professionals in order to recruit, retain, and sustain these professionals in their field.(D) Providing mental health services or financial assistance to family members of frontline community gun violence intervention professionals who are killed or violently injured in the performance of their work.(m) Each grantee shall report to the Office of Community Violence Intervention, in a form and at intervals prescribed by the office, their progress in achieving the grant objectives.(n) The Office of Community Violence Intervention shall, by no later than 120 days following the close of each grant cycle, prepare and submit a report to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code regarding the impact of the violence prevention initiatives supported by CalVIP.(o) The Office of Community Violence Intervention shall make evaluations of CalVIP-supported initiatives available to the public.(p) The amendments to this section made by the act that added this subdivision shall apply solely to CalVIP grant applications and awards made after January 1, 2024, and shall not be construed to affect grant applications or awards made prior to this date.